Connecticut, session 2026, SB00421.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section
and section 2 of this act:
(1) "Public utility pole" means a pole, including a portion of a pole,
owned by a telephone company or an electric distribution company that
is used to support wires for (A) the distribution of electricity, (B)
telecommunications services, as defined in section 16-247a of the
general statutes, or (C) the lighting of streets or sidewalks;
(2) "Double utility poles" means a replacement public utility pole
built or installed alongside, or attached to, an existing public utility pole,
or a portion of an existing public utility pole, for the purpose of
transferring the wires from the existing utility pole to the replacement
utility pole, provided the existing public utility pole, including any
portion of such utility pole, has not been removed after the installation
of the replacement utility pole;
(3) "Electric distribution company" has the same meaning as
provided in section 16-1 of the general statutes;
(4) "Telephone company" has the same meaning as provided in
LCO 1 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 421
section 16-1 of the general statutes; and
(5) "User" means any person or entity, except for an electric
distribution company, a telephone company, a municipality or a
political subdivision of a municipality, that maintains equipment of any
sort on a public utility pole.
(b) The owner of any public utility pole, or the owner's agent, shall
deliver written notice of any removal and replacement work concerning
such utility pole to each user of such utility pole not less than seventy-
two hours (1) before the starting date of any such work if such work is
planned, or (2) after such work is completed if such work was
unplanned and necessary to correct a hazardous condition on an
emergency basis. Such notice shall describe the location of the public
utility pole, the nature of the work completed or to be completed, the
date upon which such work was completed or is to be completed and
the date and method of delivery of such notice.
(c) Each user of a public utility pole that receives notice of work
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall transfer its equipment
from the existing public utility pole to the replacement public utility
pole not later than fifteen days after receiving such notice. Upon the
completion of the work to transfer equipment pursuant to this
subsection, the user shall provide written notice to the owner of such
utility pole that such work has been completed.
(d) If a user fails to complete the work required to transfer the user's
equipment in the time required under subsection (c) of this section, the
owner of the public utility pole, or the owner's agent, may complete
such work on the user's behalf. Such owner or owner's agent may
submit a bill to such user based on the prevailing rate of wages
established pursuant to section 31-53 of the general statutes for any such
work completed on behalf of such user.
(e) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, a user
that fails to transfer the user's equipment to a replacement public utility
pole in compliance with subsection (c) of this section shall be in violation
LCO 2 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 421
of this section. The Public Utilities Regulatory Authority may impose,
by order of the authority, a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred
dollars for each violation of subsection (c) of this section, and in the case
of a continued violation, each day thereof shall be deemed a separate
violation. The authority shall impose any such civil penalty in
accordance with the procedure established in section 16-41 of the
general statutes.
(2) The authority shall impose no penalty on a user pursuant to this
subsection if (A) the user of a public utility pole was prevented from
completing the transfer of such user's equipment due solely to a
municipality's failure to timely remove or transfer any equipment
owned by such municipality or a political subdivision of the
municipality, or (B) the owner of a public utility pole, or the owner's
agent, completes any work required to transfer such user's equipment
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.
(f) (1) An electric distribution company or telephone company that
removes a public utility pole, including any portion of such a utility
pole, and installs a replacement public utility pole shall complete the
transfer of any wires or equipment owned by the electric distribution
company or telephone company and the removal of the public utility
pole that was replaced not later than fifteen days after such company
receives notice from each user of such pole that each user has completed
the transfer work required by the user pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section.
(2) An electric distribution company or telephone company that fails
to transfer such company's equipment to a replacement public utility
pole, and remove the public utility pole that was replaced, in
compliance with subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be in violation
of this section. The Public Utilities Regulatory Authority may impose,
by order of the authority, a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred
dollars for each violation of this subsection, and in the case of a
continued violation, each day thereof shall be deemed a separate
violation. The authority shall impose any such civil penalty in
LCO 3 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 421
accordance with the procedure established in section 16-41 of the
general statutes.
(g) The Public Utilities Regulatory Authority shall remit the amount
of any civil penalty collected pursuant to this section or section 2 of this
act to the Commissioner of Social Services for the purpose of providing
funding for the Connecticut energy assistance program administered by
the commissioner pursuant to section 17b-2 of the general statutes.
(h) The Public Utilities Regulatory Authority may adopt regulations,
in accordance with chapter 54 of the general statutes, to implement the
provisions of this section and section 2 of this act.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after October 1,
2026, the owner of any public utility pole shall compile and maintain a
list of any double utility poles owned or maintained by such owner or
such owner's agent that have existed for not less than thirty days. Such
owner shall provide such list to the Public Utilities Regulatory
Authority upon the authority's request.
(b) Not later than October 1, 2027, the owner of any double utility
100 poles, or the owner's agent, shall undertake any work necessary to
101 eliminate such double utility poles. Any owner that fails to eliminate
102 such double utility poles on or before October 1, 2027, shall be in
103 violation of this section. The Public Utilities Regulatory Authority may
104 impose, by order of the authority, a civil penalty not to exceed one
105 hundred dollars for each violation of this section, and in the case of a
106 continued violation, each day thereof shall be deemed a separate
107 violation. The authority shall impose any such civil penalty in
108 accordance with the procedure established in section 16-41 of the
109 general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 New section
LCO 4 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 421
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(e)(1), a reference to "subsection (b)" was changed to
"subsection (c)", for accuracy.
ET Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 5 of 5